New Jersey, session 221, S2134.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A person commits a disorderly persons offense if while in possession of a hypodermic needle or syringe during the course of a lawful search or investigatory stop, the person does not declare such possession to a law enforcement officer conducting the search or stop prior to physical contact between the person and the law enforcement officer. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.